Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB637.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3059 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3059. Qualifications of municipal manager.The municipal manager shall be chosen by the council on the basis of [his] executive and administrative qualifications. At the time of [his appointment, he] the appointment and during the tenure of the municipal manager, the municipal manager need not be a resident of the municipality or this Commonwealth. The municipal manager shall not hold any elective governmental office.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617